sl-SI: Stil kljuke/zaponke strešne tovorne mreže: Vponka; Vponka z varovalom; Kavelj J; Kavelj S; Vskočnik; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de gancho/fecho da rede de carga do tejadilho: Mosquetão; Mosquetão com fecho; Gancho em J; Gancho em S; Mosquetão de mola; Outro
it: Stile del gancio/fissaggio della rete da carico sul tetto: Moschettone; Moschettone con ghiera; Gancio a J; Gancio a S; Moschettone a scatto; Altro
zh-CN: 车顶货物网挂钩/紧固件样式: 登山扣; 带锁登山扣; J 形钩; S 形钩; 弹簧钩; 其他
hr-HR: Stil kuke/pričvršćivača za mrežu za krovni teret: Karabiner; Karabiner s osiguračem; J-kuka; S-kuka; Kuka s osiguračem; Ostalo
sk-SK: Štýl háku/upevňovacieho prvku strešnej nákladnej siete: Karabína; Karabína so zámkom; J-háčik; S-háčik; Karabínka s pružinou; Iné
zh-TW: 車頂捆貨網掛鉤/扣件樣式: 登山扣; 帶鎖登山扣; J 型掛鉤; S 型掛鉤; 彈簧鉤; 其他
fi: Kattotavaraverkon koukku-/kiinnitystyyli: Karbiinihaka; Portillinen karbiinihaka; J-koukku; S-koukku; Pikalukkohaka; Muu
ja: ルーフカーゴネットフック／ファスナータイプ: カラビナ; ゲート付きカラビナ; Jフック; Sフック; スナップフック; その他
pt-BR: Rede de carga para teto estilo do gancho/fecho: Mosquetão; Mosquetão com trava; Gancho em J; Gancho em S; Gancho com trava de pressão; Outro
en: Roof cargo net hook/fastener style: Carabiner; Gated carabiner; J-hook; S-hook; Snap hook; Other
de: Haken-/Befestigungsart für Dachgepäcknetze: Karabiner; Karabiner mit Verschluss; J-Haken; S-Haken; Schnapphaken; Sonstige
nb: Krok/feste for lastenett i taket: Karabinkrok; Karabinkrok med lås; J-krok; S-krok; Fjærkrok; Annet
bg-BG: Тип куки/закопчалки на мрежата за багаж на покрива: Карабинер; Карабинер с муфа; J-образна кука; S-образна кука; Кука с пружина; Друго
cs: Styl háčku/upevnění střešní sítě: Karabina; Karabina se zámkem; Háček ve tvaru J; Háček ve tvaru S; Karabina s pojistkou; Jiné
da: Krog/fastgørelse til taglastnet: Karabinhage; Karabinhage med lukker; J-krog; S-krog; Fjederkrog; Andet
ro-RO: Stil de cârlig/prindere pentru plasa de amarare pe portbagaj: Carabinieră; Carabinieră cu clapetă; Cârlig J; Cârlig S; Cârlig cu siguranță; Altele
sv: Taklastnät – typ av krok/fäste: Karbinhake; Karbinhake med grind; J-krok; S-krok; Snäppkrok; Övrigt
vi: Lưới chở hàng trên nóc xe kiểu móc/khóa: Móc carabiner; Móc carabiner có chốt; Móc chữ J; Móc chữ S; Móc bấm; Khác
tr: Çatı kargo ağı kanca/bağlantı stili: Karabina; Kapılı karabina; J kanca; S kanca; Yaylı kanca; Diğer
ru: Стиль крюков или крепежа сетки для груза на крыше: Карабин; Карабин с защелкой; J-образный крючок; S-образный крючок; Крючок-карабин; Другое
hu: Tetőcsomagtartó-rögzítő háló kampó-/rögzítőtípusa: Karabiner; Záras karabiner; J-kampó; S-kampó; Rugós karabiner; Egyéb
pl: Styl haka/zapięcia siatki transportowej na dach: Karabinek; Karabinek z blokadą; Hak typu J (J-hook); Hak typu S (S-hook); Karabińczyk; Inne
fr: Type de crochet ou de fixation du filet de toit: Mousqueton; Mousqueton à doigt; Crochet en J; Crochet en S; Mousqueton à pompe; Autre
el: Γάντζος/σύνδεσμος για πλέγμα μεταφοράς οροφής: Καραμπίνερ; Καραμπίνερ με κλείστρο ασφαλείας; Γάντζος σχήματος J; Γάντζος σχήματος S; Γάντζος ασφαλείας; Άλλο
es: Estilo de gancho o sujetador de la red de carga para techo: Mosquetón; Mosquetón con seguro; Gancho en J; Gancho en S; Gancho de resorte; Otro
lt-LT: Stogo krovinio tinklo kablio / tvirtinimo detalės stilius: Karabinas; Karabinas su užraktu; J formos kablys; S formos kablys; Kablys su fiksatoriumi; Kita
ko: 루프 화물망 후크/고정 장치 방식: 카라비너; 게이트 카라비너; J-훅; S-훅; 스냅 훅; 기타
nl: Dakbagagenet haak-/bevestigingsstijl: Karabijnhaak; Karabijnhaak met sluiting; J-haak; S-haak; Musketonhaak; Overige
th: แบบตะขอ/ตัวยึดสำหรับตาข่ายบรรทุกสัมภาระบนหลังคา: คาราไบเนอร์; คาราไบเนอร์แบบมีประตูล็อก; ตะขอตัว J; ตะขอตัว S; ตะขอสแน็ป; อื่นๆ